Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 11. Bonds to Finance Economic Development Projects.

§ 57-10-401.
Definitions [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

[In cases involving an economic development project for which the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation has issued bonds for the purpose of financing the approved costs of such project prior to July 1, 1994, this section shall read as follows:]

As used in Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Approved company” means any eligible company seeking to locate an economic development project in a county, which eligible company is approved by the corporation.

“Approved costs” means:

Obligations incurred for equipment and labor and to contractors, subcontractors, builders and materialmen in connection with the acquisition, construction and installation of an economic development project;

The cost of acquiring land or rights in land and any cost incidental thereto, including recording fees;

The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary during the course of acquisition, construction and installation of an economic development project which is not paid by the contractor or contractors or otherwise provided for;

All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test borings, surveys, estimates, plans and specifications, preliminary investigations, and supervision of construction, as well as for the performance of all the duties required by or consequent upon the acquisition, construction and installation of an economic development project;

All costs which shall be required to be paid under the terms of any contract or contracts for the acquisition, construction and installation of an economic development project;

All costs, expenses and fees incurred in connection with the issuance of bonds pursuant to Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445;

All costs funded by a loan made under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act; and

All costs of professionals permitted to be engaged under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act for a loan made under such act.

“Assessment” means the job development assessment fee authorized in Section 57-10-413.

“Bonds” means the revenue bonds, notes or other debt obligations of the corporation authorized to be issued by the corporation on behalf of an eligible company or other state agency.

“Corporation” means the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation created under Section 57-10-167, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Economic development project” means and includes the acquisition of any equipment or real estate in a county and the construction and installation thereon, and with respect thereto, of improvements and facilities necessary or desirable for improvement of the real estate, including surveys, site tests and inspections, subsurface site work, excavation, removal of structures, roadways, cemeteries and other surface obstructions, filling, grading and provision of drainage, storm water detention, installation of utilities such as water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electricity, communications and similar facilities, off-site construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of the real estate, and the acquisition, construction and installation of manufacturing, telecommunications, data processing, distribution or warehouse facilities on the real estate, for lease or financial arrangement by the corporation to an approved company for use and occupancy by the approved company or its affiliates for manufacturing, telecommunications, data processing, distribution or warehouse purposes. Such term also includes, without limitation, any project the financing of which has been approved under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act. From and after January 1, 2014, such term also includes the economic development project of a related approved company that is merged into or consolidated with another approved company where the approved companies are engaged in a vertically integrated manufacturing or warehouse operation.

“Eligible company” means any corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or other entity which is:

Engaged in manufacturing which meets the standards promulgated by the corporation under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445;

A private company approved by the corporation for a loan under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act;

A distribution or warehouse facility employing a minimum of fifty (50) people or employing a minimum of twenty (20) people and having a capital investment in such facility of at least Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00); or

A telecommunications or data processing business.

“Executive director” means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation.

“Financing agreement” means any financing documents and agreements, indentures, loan agreements, lease agreements, security agreements and the like, entered into by and among the corporation, private lenders and an approved company with respect to an economic development project.

“Manufacturing” means any activity involving the manufacturing, processing, assembling or production of any property, including the processing resulting in a change in the conditions of the property and any activity functionally related thereto, together with the storage, warehousing, distribution and related office facilities in respect thereof as determined by the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation; however, in no event shall “manufacturing” include mining, coal or mineral processing, or extraction of Mississippi minerals.

“State agency” means any state board, commission, committee, council, university, department or unit thereof created by the Constitution or laws of this state.

“Revenues” shall not be considered state funds.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

“Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act” means the provisions of law contained in Section 57-71-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 525, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 397, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 68; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 454, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-401.
Definitions [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

[In cases involving an economic development project for which the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation has not issued bonds for the purpose of financing the approved costs of such project prior to July 1, 1994, this section shall read as follows: ]

As used in Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Approved company” means any eligible company seeking to locate an economic development project in a county, which eligible company is approved by the corporation.

“Approved costs” means:

Obligations incurred for equipment and labor and to contractors, subcontractors, builders and materialmen in connection with the acquisition, construction and installation of an economic development project;

The cost of acquiring land or rights in land and any cost incidental thereto, including recording fees;

The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary during the course of acquisition, construction and installation of an economic development project which is not paid by the contractor or contractors or otherwise provided for;

All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test borings, surveys, estimates, plans and specifications, preliminary investigations, and supervision of construction, as well as for the performance of all the duties required by or consequent upon the acquisition, construction and installation of an economic development project;

All costs which shall be required to be paid under the terms of any contract or contracts for the acquisition, construction and installation of an economic development project;

All costs, expenses and fees incurred in connection with the issuance of bonds pursuant to Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445;

All costs funded by a loan made under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act; and

All costs of professionals permitted to be engaged under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act for a loan made under such act.

“Assessment” means the job development assessment fee authorized in Section 57-10-413.

“Bonds” means the revenue bonds, notes or other debt obligations of the corporation authorized to be issued by the corporation on behalf of an eligible company or other state agency.

“Corporation” means the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation created under Section 57-10-167, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Economic development project” means and includes the acquisition of any equipment or real estate in a county and the construction and installation thereon, and with respect thereto, of improvements and facilities necessary or desirable for improvement of the real estate, including surveys, site tests and inspections, subsurface site work, excavation, removal of structures, roadways, cemeteries and other surface obstructions, filling, grading and provision of drainage, storm water detention, installation of utilities such as water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electricity, communications and similar facilities, off-site construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of the real estate, and the acquisition, construction and installation of manufacturing, telecommunications, data processing, distribution or warehouse facilities on the real estate, for lease or financial arrangement by the corporation to an approved company for use and occupancy by the approved company or its affiliates for manufacturing, telecommunications, data processing, distribution or warehouse purposes. Such term also includes, without limitation, any project the financing of which has been approved under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act.

If an eligible company closes a facility in this state and becomes an approved company under the provisions of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-449, only that portion of the project for which such company is attempting to obtain financing that is in excess of the value of the closed facility shall be included within the definition of the term “economic development project.” The Mississippi Business Finance Corporation shall promulgate rules and regulations to govern the determination of the difference between the value of the closed facility and the new facility.

“Eligible company” means any corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or other entity which:

Engaged in manufacturing which meets the standards promulgated by the corporation under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445;

A private company approved by the corporation for a loan under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act;

A distribution or warehouse facility employing a minimum of fifty (50) people or employing a minimum of twenty (20) people and having a capital investment in such facility of at least Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00);

A telecommunications or data/information processing business meeting criteria established by the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation;

National or regional headquarters meeting criteria established by the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation;

Research and development facilities meeting criteria established by the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation; or

Technology intensive enterprises or facilities meeting criteria established by the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation.

“Executive director” means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation.

“Financing agreement” means any financing documents and agreements, indentures, loan agreements, lease agreements, security agreements and the like, entered into by and among the corporation, private lenders and an approved company with respect to an economic development project.

“Manufacturing” means any activity involving the manufacturing, processing, assembling or production of any property, including the processing resulting in a change in the conditions of the property and any activity functionally related thereto, together with the storage, warehousing, distribution and related office facilities in respect thereof as determined by the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation; however, in no event shall “manufacturing” include mining, coal or mineral processing, or extraction of Mississippi minerals.

“State agency” means any state board, commission, committee, council, university, department or unit thereof created by the Constitution or laws of this state.

“Revenues” shall not be considered state funds.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

“Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act” means the provisions of law contained in Section 57-71-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 525, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 397, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 68; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 454, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-403.
Legislative findings and declarations [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The Legislature finds and declares that the general welfare and material well-being of citizens of the state depend in large measure upon the development and growth of industry in the state.

The Legislature finds and declares further that it is in the best interest of the state to induce the location or expansion of manufacturing facilities within this state in order to advance the public purposes of relieving unemployment by creating new jobs within this state that, but for the inducements to be offered by the corporation to approved companies as herein provided, would not exist, and of creating new sources of tax revenues for the support of the public services provided by this state and country.

The Legislature finds and declares further that the authority granted by this article and the purposes to be accomplished hereby are proper governmental and public purposes for which public monies may be expended, and that the inducement of the location or expansion of manufacturing facilities within the state is of paramount importance, mandating that the provisions of this article be liberally construed and applied in order to advance the public purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-405.
General powers and duties of corporation [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

In addition to its other powers and duties, the corporation shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

To provide and finance economic development projects under the provisions of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, and cooperate with counties, municipalities and eligible companies in order to promote, foster and support economic development within the counties and municipalities;

To conduct hearings and inquiries, in the manner and by the methods as it deems desirable, including, without limitation, appointment of special committees, for the purpose of gathering information with respect to counties, municipalities, eligible companies and economic development projects, for the purpose of making any determinations necessary or desirable in the furtherance of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445;

To negotiate the terms of, and enter into financing agreements with, approved companies, and in connection therewith to acquire, convey, sell, own, lease, mortgage, finance, foreclose or otherwise dispose of any property, real or personal, in connection with an economic development project, and to pay, or cause to be paid, in accordance with the provisions of a financing agreement, the approved costs of an economic development project from any funds available therefor, including, without limitation, funds available as the result of the issuance of bonds under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act;

To delegate to the executive director the rights and powers of the corporation required for the proper and desirable execution of the purposes of this article;

To consent, if it deems it necessary or desirable in the fulfillment of its purposes, to the modification of the terms of any financing agreements of any kind to which the corporation is a party;

To include in any borrowing the amounts deemed necessary by the corporation to pay financing charges, consultant, advisory and legal fees, fees for bond insurance, letters of credit or other forms of credit enhancement, investment advisory fees, trustees’ fees and other expenses necessary or incident to the borrowing;

To make and publish administrative regulations respecting its programs and other administrative regulations necessary or appropriate to effectuate the purposes of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, and necessary to administer the procedures and program as provided for in Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445;

To make, execute and effectuate any and all agreements or other documents with any governmental agency or any person, corporation, association, partnership, or other organization or entity, necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, including any financing agreements with state agencies or any political subdivisions of the state under which funds may be pledged by or to the corporation for the payment of its bonds;

To accept gifts, devises, bequests, grants, loans, appropriations, revenue sharing, other financing and assistance and any other aid from any source and to agree to, and to comply with, conditions attached thereto;

To sue and be sued in its own name, plead and be impleaded; and

To invest any funds held by the corporation or its agents or trustees, under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, including, but not limited to, the proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, reserve or other funds, or any monies not required for immediate disbursement, and the investment income on any of the foregoing, in obligations authorized by Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-407.
Power of corporation to accept and expend monies [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

The corporation may accept and expend: (a) monies which may be appropriated from time to time by the Legislature; (b) monies which may be available under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act; or (c) monies which may be received from any source, including income from the corporation’s operations, under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, for effectuating the purposes of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, including, without limitation, the payment of the expenses of administration and operation incurred pursuant to Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 and the establishment and, if deemed desirable, maintenance of a reserve or contingency fund for the administration of Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-409.
Financing agreements [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

[In cases involving an economic development project for which the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation has issued bonds for the purpose of financing the approved costs of such project prior to July 1, 1994, this section shall read as follows:]

The corporation may enter into, with any approved company, a financing agreement with respect to its economic development project. The terms and provisions of each financing agreement shall be determined by negotiations between the corporation and the approved company, except that each financing agreement shall include the following provisions:

If the corporation issues any bonds in connection with an economic development project, the term of the financing agreement shall not be less than the last maturity of the bonds issued with respect to the economic development project, except that the financing agreement may terminate upon the earlier redemption of all of the bonds issued with respect to the economic development project and may grant to the approved company an option to purchase the economic development project from the corporation upon the termination of the financing agreement for such consideration and under such terms and conditions the corporation may approve. Nothing in this paragraph shall limit the extension of the term of a financing agreement if there is a refunding of the correlative bonds or otherwise.

If the corporation issues any bonds in connection with an economic development project, the financing agreement shall specify that the annual obligations of the approved company under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall equal in each year at least the annual debt service for that year on the bonds issued with respect to the economic development project; and the approved company shall pay such obligation of the financing agreement to the trustee for bonds issued for the benefit of the approved company, at such time and in such amounts sufficient to amortize such bonds.

If the corporation loans funds to an approved company that is a private company under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act, the financing agreement shall include the terms and conditions of the loan required by Section 57-71-1 et seq.

(i) In consideration for financing agreement payment, the approved company may be permitted the following during the period of time in which the financing agreement is in effect, not to exceed twenty-five (25) years:

1. A tax credit on the amount provided for in Section 27-7-22.3(2), Mississippi Code of 1972; plus

2. The aggregate assessment withheld by the approved company in each year.

The income tax credited to the approved company referred to herein shall be credited in the fiscal year of the financing agreement in which the tax return of the approved company is filed. The approved company shall not be required to pay estimated tax payments under Section 27-7-319, Mississippi Code of 1972.

(i) The financing agreement shall provide that the assessments, when added to the credit for the state corporate income tax herein granted, shall not exceed the total financing agreement annual payment by the approved company in any year; however, to the extent that financing agreement annual payments exceed credits received and assessments collected in any year, the excess payment may be recouped from excess credits or assessment collections in succeeding years.

If during any fiscal year of the financing agreement the total of the income tax credit granted to the approved company plus the assessment collected from the wages of the employees equals the annual payment pursuant to the financing agreement, and if all excess payments pursuant to the financing agreement accumulated in prior years have been recouped, the assessment collected from the wages of the employees shall cease for the remainder of the fiscal year of the financing agreement.

The financing agreement shall provide that:

It may be assigned by the approved company only upon the prior written consent of the corporation following the adoption of a resolution by the corporation to such effect; and

Upon the default by the approved company in the obligation to render its annual payment, the corporation shall have the right, at its option, to declare the financing agreement in default and to accelerate the total of all annual payments that are to be made or to terminate the financing agreement and cause to be sold the economic development project at public or private sale, or to pursue any other remedies available under the Uniform Commercial Code, as from time to time amended, or otherwise available in law or equity.

HISTORY:
reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 340, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 525, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-409.
Financing agreements [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

[In cases involving an economic development project for which the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation has not issued bonds for the purpose of financing the approved costs of such project prior to July 1, 1994, but has issued bonds for such project prior to July 1, 1997, or in cases involving an economic development project which has been induced by a resolution of the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation that has been filed with the State Tax Commission prior to July 1, 1997, this section shall read as follows:]

The corporation may enter into, with any approved company, a financing agreement with respect to its economic development project. The terms and provisions of each financing agreement shall be determined by negotiations between the corporation and the approved company, except that each financing agreement shall include the following provisions:

If the corporation issues any bonds in connection with an economic development project, the term of the financing agreement shall not be less than the last maturity of the bonds issued with respect to the economic development project, except that the financing agreement may terminate upon the earlier redemption of all of the bonds issued with respect to the economic development project and may grant to the approved company an option to purchase the economic development project from the corporation upon the termination of the financing agreement for such consideration and under such terms and conditions the corporation may approve. Nothing in this paragraph shall limit the extension of the term of a financing agreement if there is a refunding of the correlative bonds or otherwise.

If the corporation issues any bonds in connection with an economic development project, the financing agreement shall specify that the annual obligations of the approved company under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall equal in each year at least the annual debt service for that year on the bonds issued with respect to the economic development project; and the approved company shall pay such obligation of the financing agreement to the trustee for bonds issued for the benefit of the approved company, at such time and in such amounts sufficient to amortize such bonds.

If the corporation loans funds to an approved company that is a private company under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act, the financing agreement shall include the terms and conditions of the loan required by Section 57-71-1 et seq.

(i) In consideration for financing agreement payment, the approved company may be permitted the following during the period of time in which the financing agreement is in effect, not to exceed twenty-five (25) years:

1. A tax credit on the amount provided for in Section 27-7-22.3(2), Mississippi Code of 1972; plus

2. The aggregate assessment withheld by the approved company in each year.

The income tax credited to the approved company referred to herein shall be credited in the fiscal year of the financing agreement in which the tax return of the approved company is filed. The approved company shall not be required to pay estimated tax payments under Section 27-7-319, Mississippi Code of 1972.

(i) The financing agreement shall provide that the assessments, when added to the credit for the state corporate income tax herein granted, shall not exceed the total financing agreement annual payment by the approved company in any year; however, to the extent that financing agreement annual payments exceed credits received and assessments collected in any year, the excess payment may be recouped from excess credits or assessment collections in succeeding years not to exceed three (3) years following the termination of the period of time during which the financing agreement is in effect.

If during any fiscal year of the financing agreement the total of the income tax credit granted to the approved company plus the assessment collected from the wages of the employees equals the annual payment pursuant to the financing agreement, and if all excess payments pursuant to the financing agreement accumulated in prior years have been recouped, the assessment collected from the wages of the employees shall cease for the remainder of the fiscal year of the financing agreement.

The financing agreement shall provide that:

It may be assigned by the approved company only upon the prior written consent of the corporation following the adoption of a resolution by the corporation to such effect; and

Upon the default by the approved company in the obligation to render its annual payment, the corporation shall have the right, at its option, to declare the financing agreement in default and to accelerate the total of all annual payments that are to be made or to terminate the financing agreement and cause to be sold the economic development project at public or private sale, or to pursue any other remedies available under the Uniform Commercial Code, as from time to time amended, or otherwise available in law or equity.

HISTORY:
reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 340, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 525, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-10-409.
Financing agreements [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

[In cases involving an economic development project for which the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation has not issued bonds for the purpose of financing the approved costs of such project prior to July 1, 1997, or in cases involving an economic development project which has not been induced by a resolution of the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation that has been filed with the State Tax Commission prior to July 1, 1997, this section shall read as follows:]

The corporation may enter into, with any approved company, a financing agreement with respect to its economic development project. The terms and provisions of each financing agreement shall be determined by negotiations between the corporation and the approved company, except that each financing agreement shall include the following provisions:

If the corporation issues any bonds in connection with an economic development project, the term of the financing agreement shall not be less than the last maturity of the bonds issued with respect to the economic development project, except that the financing agreement may terminate upon the earlier redemption of all of the bonds issued with respect to the economic development project and may grant to the approved company an option to purchase the economic development project from the corporation upon the termination of the financing agreement for such consideration and under such terms and conditions the corporation may approve. Nothing in this paragraph shall limit the extension of the term of a financing agreement if there is a refunding of the correlative bonds or otherwise.

If the corporation issues any bonds in connection with an economic development project, the financing agreement shall specify that the annual obligations of the approved company under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445 shall equal in each year at least the annual debt service for that year on the bonds issued with respect to the economic development project; and the approved company shall pay such obligation of the financing agreement to the trustee for bonds issued for the benefit of the approved company, at such time and in such amounts sufficient to amortize such bonds.

If the corporation loans funds to an approved company that is a private company under the Mississippi Small Enterprise Development Finance Act, the financing agreement shall include the terms and conditions of the loan required by Section 57-71-1 et seq.

(i) In consideration for financing agreement payment, the approved company may be permitted a tax credit on the amount provided for in Section 27-7-22.3(2), Mississippi Code of 1972, during the period of time in which the financing agreement is in effect, not to exceed twenty-five (25) years.

The income tax credited to the approved company referred to herein shall be credited in the fiscal year of the financing agreement in which the tax return of the approved company is filed. The approved company shall not be required to pay estimated tax payments under Section 27-7-319, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The financing agreement shall provide that:

It may be assigned by the approved company only upon the prior written consent of the corporation following the adoption of a resolution by the corporation to such effect; and

Upon the default by the approved company in the obligation to render its annual payment, the corporation shall have the right, at its option, to declare the financing agreement in default and to accelerate the total of all annual payments that are to be made or to terminate the financing agreement and cause to be sold the economic development project at public or private sale, or to pursue any other remedies available under the Uniform Commercial Code, as from time to time amended, or otherwise available in law or equity.

HISTORY:
reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§57-10-409.
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 340, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 525, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 5.

§ 57-10-411.
Certification of company’s state income tax liability and amount of tax credits [Repealed effective October 1, 2022].

Ninety (90) days after the filing of the tax return of the approved company, the Department of Revenue shall certify to the corporation the state income tax liability for the preceding year of each approved company with respect to an economic development project financed under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445, and the amounts of any tax credits taken under Sections 57-10-401 through 57-10-445.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 565, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 576, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 425, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 399, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 389, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 519, § 6; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2015, ch. 398, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 325, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2017.